Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department of  Environmental Quality, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the
following purposes:
(1) Air quality.................................  $ 23,729,099
(2) Water quality............................  $ 41,029,519
(3) Land quality..............................  $ 2,645,890
(4) Agency management.................  $ 1,754,702
(5) Debt service ..............................  $ 8,529,380
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, the
proceeds of bonds for the  Orphan Site Account and federal funds from congestion mitigation
and air quality grants, drinking water protection,  laboratory accreditation and woodstove
grants and for smoke monitoring laboratory services, but excluding lottery funds  and federal
funds not described in this section, collected or received by the Department  of Environ-
mental Quality, for the following purposes:
(1) Air quality................................. $113,325,766
(2) Water quality ............................ $ 32,957,021
(3) Land quality.............................. $ 99,073,155
(4) Agency management ................. $ 43,964,101
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$6,453,619 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Parks and Natural Resources
Fund to the Department  of Environmental Quality for activities and projects to implement
Article XV, section 4 (8), of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 4. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, the following  expenditures by the
Department of Environmental Quality are not limited:
(1) Expenditures for debt service and debt  service administrative costs related to the
Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund and the Pollution Control Fund; and
Enrolled House Bill 5018 (HB 5018-A) Page 1
(2) Expenditures made for loans from  the Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund and
loans from the Pollution Control Fund.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds other than those described  in section 2 of this 2023 Act, col-
lected or received by the Department of Environmental Quality, for the following purposes:
(1) Air quality................................. $ 13,517,595
(2) Water quality ............................ $ 18,729,195
(3) Land quality.............................. $ 8,857,121
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$10,805,524 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by  the Department of Environmental Quality from American Rescue
Plan Act Coronavirus  State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received by the Oregon Depart-
ment of Administrative Services and transferred to the Department of Environmental Qual-
ity, for the Onsite Septic Financial Aid Program.
SECTION 7.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by House June 13, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5018 (HB 5018-A) Page 2